Utah statutes.
38-1a-305.   Payments applied first to preconstruction lien.

Unless an agreement waiving or limiting a right under a preconstruction or construction lien expressly provides that a payment is required to be applied to a specific lien, mortgage, or encumbrance, a payment to a person claiming both a preconstruction lien and a construction lien shall be applied first to the preconstruction lien until paid in full.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

